Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1248
Fireworks; importation
into state; duties of licensees; retention of packing
list for inspection.

(1) It shall be
unlawful for any person not licensed as a distributor or as a jobber under sections
28-1241 to 28-1252 to bring any fireworks into this state.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any retailer or jobber in this
state to sell any fireworks in this state which have not been purchased from
a distributor licensed under sections 28-1241 to 28-1252.

(3) Any person licensed under sections 28-1239.01 and 28-1241 to 28-1252 shall keep,
available for inspection by the State Fire Marshal or his or her agents, a copy of each packing
list for fireworks purchased as long as any fireworks included
on such packing list are held in his or her possession. The packing list shall show the
license number of the distributor or jobber from which the purchase was made.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 280;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 7.